North Dakota, session 69, HB1239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 11-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Protection for digital asset mining.
1. An individual may not be prohibited, restricted, or otherwise prevented from
participating in digital asset mining in an area zoned for residential use if the individual
engaging in digital asset mining complies with all county noise ordinances.
2. In an area zoned for commercial use, a county may not:
a. Place a limit on sound decibels generated from a digital asset mining business
which is more restrictive than limits imposed for sound pollution in that area
generally.
b. Place restrictions on a digital asset mining business which do not apply to other
businesses in that area.
c. Change the zoning of a digital asset mining business without providing notice and
an opportunity for comment.
3. A digital asset mining business may appeal a change in zoning to the district court.
4. For purposes of this section:
Page No. 1 25.0518.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. "Digital asset mining" means using computer hardware and software specifically
designed or used for the purpose of validating data and securing a blockchain
network.
b. "Digital asset mining business" means an individual or company operating a
digital asset mining facility that cumulatively draws more than one megawatt of
power in the state.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 40-47 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Protection for digital asset mining.
1. An individual may not be prohibited, restricted, or otherwise prevented from
participating in digital asset mining in an area zoned for residential use if the individual
engaging in digital asset mining complies with all city noise ordinances.
2. In an area zoned for commercial use, a city may not:
a. Place a limit on sound decibels generated from a digital asset mining business
which is more restrictive than limits imposed for sound pollution in that area
generally.
b. Place restrictions on a digital asset mining business which do not apply to other
businesses in that area.
c. Change the zoning of a digital asset mining business without providing notice and
an opportunity for comment.
3. A digital asset mining business may appeal a change in zoning to the district court.
4. For purposes of this section:
a. "Digital asset mining" means using computer hardware and software specifically
designed or used for the purpose of validating data and securing a blockchain
network.
b. "Digital asset mining business" means an individual or company operating a
digital asset mining facility that cumulatively draws more than one megawatt of
power in the state.
SECTION 3. A new chapter to title 51 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Page No. 2 25.0518.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Definitions.
In this chapter, unless the context of use clearly requires otherwise:
1. "Blockchain protocol" means any executable software deployed to a blockchain,
including an additional standardized set of rules that use a previously existing
blockchain as a base and which facilitate the transfer of data and electronic records
and allow that data to be broadcast to nodes.
2. "Central bank digital currency" means a digital currency, a digital medium of exchange,
or a digital monetary unit of account issued by the United States federal reserve
system or a federal agency which is made directly available to institutions or
consumers by those entities, or which is processed or validated directly by those
entities. The term does not include a digital asset backed by legal tender or
government treasuries and issued by a private entity.
3. "Digital asset" means virtual currency, cryptocurrencies, natively electronic assets,
including stablecoins and nonfungible tokens, and other digital-only assets that confer
economic, proprietary, or access rights or powers.
4. "Governing authority" means any state agency or board, commission, or department
or any political subdivision.
5. "Hardware wallet" means a physical device that is not continuously connected to the
internet and allows an individual to secure and transfer digital assets. The term
includes a physical device under which the owner of digital assets retains independent
control over the digital assets.
6. a. "Node" means a computational device that:
(1) Communicates with other devices or participants on a blockchain to
maintain consensus and integrity of that blockchain;
(2) Creates and validates transaction blocks; or
(3) Contains and updates a copy of a blockchain.
b. A node does not exercise discretion over transactions initiated by the end user of
the blockchain protocol.
7. "Self-hosted wallet" means a digital interface used to:
a. Secure and transfer digital assets; and
Page No. 3 25.0518.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. Retain independent control over the secured digital assets by the owner of the
digital asset.
8. "Staking" means committing digital assets to a blockchain network to participate in the
blockchain network's operations by validating transactions and securing the network.
Prohibitions on use and testing of central bank digital currency.
1. A governing authority may not accept or require a payment using central bank digital
currency.
2. A governing authority may not participate in any test of central bank digital currency by
the board of governors of the federal reserve system or any branch or agency of the
federal government.
Permitted uses of digital assets.
A governing authority may not prohibit, restrict, or otherwise impair the ability of an
individual or business to accept digital assets as a method of payment for legal goods and
services.
Access to blockchain protocols and transfer of digital assets.
A person may:
1. Operate a node for the purpose of connecting to a blockchain protocol and
participating in the blockchain protocol's operations.
2. Develop software on a blockchain protocol.
3. Participate in staking on a blockchain protocol.
SECTION 4. A new section to chapter 58-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Protection for digital asset mining.
1. An individual may not be prohibited, restricted, or otherwise prevented from
participating in digital asset mining in an area zoned for residential use if the individual
engaging in digital asset mining complies with all township noise ordinances.
2. In an area zoned for commercial use, a township may not:
a. Place a limit on sound decibels generated from a digital asset mining business
which is more restrictive than limits imposed for sound pollution in that area
generally.
Page No. 4 25.0518.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. Place restrictions on a digital asset mining business which do not apply to other
businesses in that area.
c. Change the zoning of a digital asset mining business without providing notice and
an opportunity for comment.
3. A digital asset mining business may appeal a change in zoning to the district court.
4. For purposes of this section:
a. "Digital asset mining" means using computer hardware and software specifically
designed or used for the purpose of validating data and securing a blockchain
network.
b. "Digital asset mining business" means an individual or company operating a
digital asset mining facility that cumulatively draws more than one megawatt of
power in the state.
Page No. 5 25.0518.02000